North Carolina, session 2025, HB385.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of S.L. 2024-31 is repealed.
SECTION 2. Prosecutions for offenses charged prior to the enactment of this act
shall be abated. Any charges shall be dismissed without leave.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies retroactively to
December 1, 2024.
*H385-v-1*